Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3 FEES AND CASH FUNDS
42-3-306. Registration fees - passenger and passenger-mile taxes - fee schedule.

This section shall apply in any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2010.

Fees for the annual registration of passenger-carrying motor vehicles shall be as follows:

Motorcycles, three dollars;

Passenger cars, station wagons, taxicabs, ambulances, motor homes, and hearses:

Weighing two thousand pounds or less, six dollars;

Weighing forty-five hundred pounds or less, six dollars plus twenty cents per one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, of weight over two thousand pounds;

Weighing more than forty-five hundred pounds, twelve dollars and fifty cents plus sixty cents per one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, of weight over forty-five hundred pounds; except that, for motor homes weighing more than sixty-five hundred pounds, such fees shall be twenty-four dollars and fifty cents plus thirty cents per one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, of weight over sixty-five hundred pounds.

In addition to the registration fees imposed by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), an additional registration fee shall be imposed on the motor vehicles described in the introductory portion to this paragraph (b), based on the age of the motor vehicle, as follows:

For motor vehicles less than seven years old, twelve dollars;

For motor vehicles seven years old but less than ten years old, ten dollars;

For motor vehicles ten years old or older, seven dollars.

The additional fees collected pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund to be allocated pursuant to section 43-4-205 (6)(b), C.R.S.

If a regional transportation plan is implemented within the regional transportation district, residents of the E-470 highway authority area shall be exempt from the first ten dollars of any motor vehicle registration fee increase in such plan.

Passenger buses:

All such vehicles used for the transportation of passengers for compensation having a seating capacity of fourteen or less passengers, twenty-five dollars plus one dollar and seventy cents for each seat capacity; and all such vehicles having a seating capacity of more than fourteen passengers, twenty-five dollars plus one dollar and twenty-five cents for each seat capacity in excess of fourteen;

All such vehicles owned by a private owner and used for the transportation of school pupils having a juvenile seating capacity (meaning fourteen lineal inches of seat space) of twenty-five or less, fifteen dollars; and for all such vehicles having a juvenile seating capacity of more than twenty-five, fifteen dollars plus fifty cents for each juvenile seat capacity in excess of twenty-five.

Fees for the annual registration of the following vehicles shall be:

Trailer coaches, three dollars;

Trailers, utility trailers, and camper trailers having an empty weight of two thousand pounds or less, three dollars;

Trailers, utility trailers, and camper trailers having an empty weight exceeding two thousand pounds, seven dollars and fifty cents;

Semitrailers, seven dollars and fifty cents.

The annual registration fee for trucks and truck tractors owned by a farmer or rancher that are operated over the public highways and are only commercially used to transport to market or place of storage raw agricultural products actually produced or livestock actually raised by such farmer or rancher or to transport commodities and livestock purchased by such farmer or rancher for personal use and used in such person's farming or ranching operations, shall be as follows:

Each such vehicle having an empty weight of five thousand pounds or less, an amount computed to the nearest pound of the empty weight of such vehicle, according to the following schedule:

Each such vehicle having an empty weight of ten thousand pounds or less but more than five thousand pounds, fifteen dollars and fifty cents plus forty-five cents per one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, of empty weight over five thousand pounds;

Each such vehicle having an empty weight of more than ten thousand pounds but not more than sixteen thousand pounds, thirty-eight dollars plus one dollar and twenty cents per one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, of empty weight exceeding ten thousand pounds;

Each such vehicle having an empty weight of more than sixteen thousand pounds, one hundred ten dollars, plus one dollar and fifty cents per one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, of empty weight exceeding sixteen thousand pounds.

Nothing in this subsection (4) shall be construed to prevent a farmer or rancher from occasionally exchanging transportation with another farmer or rancher, but only if the sole consideration involved is the exchange of personal services or the use of equipment.

A person applying for registration under this subsection (4) shall certify to the licensing authority on forms furnished by the department that the vehicle will be used in conformity with paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

No vehicle carrying mounted equipment other than a camper or other purely recreational equipment shall be registered under this subsection (4), and a vehicle registered under this subsection (4) shall be reregistered under the proper classification whenever equipment designed for commercial use is mounted upon such vehicle.

The department or its authorized agent shall not require a person registering a farm truck or truck tractor under this subsection (4) to demonstrate that the owner's primary business or source of income is agriculture if the farm truck or truck tractor is used primarily for agricultural production on a farm or ranch owned or leased by the owner of the truck or truck tractor, and the land on which it is used is classified as agricultural land for the purposes of levying and collecting property tax under section 39-1-103, C.R.S.

The annual registration fee for those trucks and truck tractors operated over the public highways of this state, except trucks that are registered under subsections (4) and (13) of this section and section 42-12-401 (1)(c), is as follows:

For each such vehicle having an empty weight of up to and including sixteen thousand pounds, such registration fee shall be based upon the empty weight of such vehicle, computed to the nearest pound, according to the following schedule:

Except as provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (b), for each vehicle registered under this subsection (5) having an empty weight exceeding sixteen thousand pounds, the registration fee shall be based upon the declared gross vehicle weight of the vehicle registered, according to the following schedule:

For each vehicle registered under this subsection (5) that has an empty weight exceeding sixteen thousand pounds and that is used in the operations of a common or contract carrier for hire, such registration fee shall be based upon the declared gross vehicle weight of the vehicle registered, according to the following schedule:

For each vehicle registered under this subsection (5) that has an empty weight exceeding sixteen thousand pounds and that is operated less than ten thousand miles in all jurisdictions during each year, such registration fee shall be based upon the declared gross vehicle weight of the vehicle registered, according to the following schedule:

If a vehicle qualifies for both a registration fee provided in this subparagraph (III) and a registration fee provided in subparagraph (I) or (II) of this paragraph (b), the lesser registration fee shall apply.

If a person replaces a registered vehicle with another vehicle, the mileage history of the vehicle being replaced may be used to qualify the new vehicle for the fees assessed under this subparagraph (III).

If a person purchases an established business that is located in this state and the purchase of the business includes the purchase of vehicles, the mileage history of a vehicle so purchased may be used to qualify for the fees assessed under this subparagraph (III) if the business operations remain the same after the purchase and if, during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of purchase, the vehicle has been registered in Colorado and has been in operation in the business. A person purchasing a business shall present a copy of the current vehicle registration of the previous owner for each vehicle to be registered pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (D).

If a truck or truck tractor having an empty weight exceeding sixteen thousand pounds is purchased by a person owning one or more other such vehicles and the other such vehicles owned by the purchaser all qualify for the fees assessed under this subparagraph (III), the purchased truck or truck tractor also qualifies for the fees assessed under this subparagraph (III). A person seeking to register a truck or truck tractor pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (E) shall present a copy of the current vehicle registration for each of the other trucks and truck tractors with empty weights exceeding sixteen thousand pounds that are owned by such person.

For each vehicle registered under this subsection (5) that is exempt from the registration fees assessed under paragraph (b) of this subsection (5) under paragraph (d), (f), (g), or (h) of subsection (9) of this section and that weighs more than sixteen thousand pounds empty weight, the registration fee shall be one hundred seventy-five dollars plus one dollar and fifteen cents for each one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, in excess of sixteen thousand pounds.

For each vehicle registered under this subsection (5) that is exempt from the registration fees assessed under paragraph (b) of this subsection (5) pursuant to paragraph (d), (f), or (g) of subsection (9) of this section and that weighs more than sixteen thousand pounds empty weight, the registration fee shall be two hundred thirty-three dollars plus one dollar and fifty cents for each one hundred pounds, or fraction thereof, in excess of sixteen thousand pounds.

Each vehicle registered under this subsection (5) having an empty weight not in excess of sixteen thousand pounds that is operated in combination with a trailer or semitrailer, which is commonly referred to as a tractor-trailer, shall be assessed according to paragraph (b) of this subsection (5).

In lieu of the payment of registration fees specified in subsections (3) and (5) of this section, the owner of a truck, truck tractor, trailer, or semitrailer operating in interstate commerce may apply to the department for a special unladen weight registration. The registration shall be valid for a period of thirty days from issuance and shall authorize the operation of the vehicle only when empty. The fee for registration of a truck or truck tractor shall be five dollars. The fee for registration of a trailer or semitrailer shall be three dollars. The moneys from the fees shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(c), C.R.S.

In lieu of the payment of registration fees specified in subsections (3) and (5) of this section, the owner of a truck or truck tractor operating in interstate commerce shall apply to the department for a special laden weight registration. The registration shall be valid for seventy-two hours after issuance and shall authorize the operation of the vehicle when loaded. The moneys collected by the department from the fees shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(c), C.R.S. The fee for the special registration of a truck or a truck tractor shall be based on the actual gross vehicle weight of the vehicle and its cargo, computed to the nearest pound, according to the following schedule:

The owner or operator of a motor vehicle that is exempt from the registration fees assessed under paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection (9) of this section may apply to the department for a temporary commercial registration permit for such motor vehicle. Such temporary commercial registration permit shall authorize the operation of such motor vehicle in commerce so long as the motor vehicle is operated solely in agricultural harvest operations within Colorado.

A temporary commercial registration permit issued pursuant to this subsection (8) shall be valid for a period not to exceed sixty days. A maximum of two such temporary commercial registration permits may be issued for a motor vehicle in a twelve-month period. The fee for issuance of a temporary commercial registration permit for a motor vehicle shall be based upon the configuration and number of axles of such motor vehicle according to the following schedule:

The moneys collected by the department from the fees for temporary commercial registration permits shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund.

This subsection (8) shall not be interpreted to affect the authority of a dealer in motor vehicles to use a dealer plate obtained under section 42-3-116 to demonstrate a truck or truck tractor by allowing a prospective buyer to operate such truck or truck tractor when loaded.

The registration fees imposed by paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of this section shall not apply:

To a motor vehicle operated by a manufacturer, dealer, or transporter issued plates pursuant to section 42-3-304 (6) and (7);

To a farm truck or truck tractor registered under subsection (4) of this section;

To a farm tractor or to a farm tractor and trailer or wagon combination;

To a vehicle specially constructed for towing, wrecking, and repairing that is not otherwise used for transporting cargo;

To a vehicle owned by the state or any political or governmental subdivision thereof;

To an operator-owned vehicle transporting racehorses to and from the stud or to and from a racing meet in Colorado;

To a veterinary mobile truck unit;

To a mobile mixing concrete truck or trash compacting truck or to trucks designated by the executive director of the department as special use trucks;

To a noncommercial or recreational vehicle registered under subsection (13) of this section.

The owner or operator of a truck, truck tractor, trailer, or semitrailer operating over the public highways of this state and rendering service pursuant to a temporary certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the public utilities commission shall pay for the issuance or renewal of such temporary certificate a fee of ten dollars.

The owner or operator of a passenger bus operating over the public highways of this state and rendering service pursuant to a temporary certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the public utilities commission shall pay for the issuance or renewal of such temporary certificate a fee of ten dollars, which fee shall be in lieu of the tax assessed under this subsection (11), shall be credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., as required by section 43-4-203 (1)(c), C.R.S., and shall be allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(d), C.R.S.

The owner or operator of a passenger bus that is registered in another state and that is used to make an occasional trip into this state need not obtain a permit from the public utilities commission as provided in article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., but may instead apply to the department for the issuance of a trip permit and shall pay to the department for the issuance of such trip permit a fee of twenty-five dollars or the amount of passenger-mile tax becoming due and payable under paragraph (a) of this subsection (11) by reason of such trip, whichever amount is greater. The fee or passenger-mile tax shall be credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., as required by section 43-4-203 (1)(c), C.R.S., and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(d), C.R.S.

In lieu of registration under section 42-3-304 (14), the owner or operator of special mobile machinery that the owner or operator desires to operate over the public highways of this state may elect to pay an annual fee computed at the rate of two dollars and fifty cents per ton of vehicle weight for operation not to exceed a distance of two thousand five hundred miles in any registration period.

In lieu of registration under section 42-3-304 (14), a public utility, as defined by section 40-1-103, C.R.S., owning or operating a utility truck having an empty weight in excess of ten thousand pounds that it desires to operate over the public highways of this state may elect to pay an annual registration fee for such a vehicle computed at the rate of ten dollars per ton of vehicle weight.

The annual registration fee for a noncommercial or recreational vehicle, except a motor home, operated on the public highways of this state with an empty weight of ten thousand pounds or less shall be computed according to the schedule provided in subsection (5) of this section, and, for a noncommercial or recreational vehicle exceeding ten thousand pounds, the fee shall be twenty-four dollars and fifty cents plus sixty cents for each one hundred pounds in excess of four thousand five hundred pounds.

In addition to any other fee required by this section, on and after July 1, 2011, each authorized agent shall collect a fee of:

Fifty cents per paid registration of any motor vehicle that is not exempt from the motor insurance identification fee pursuant to section 42-3-304 (1)(b); or

Ten cents per paid registration of any motor vehicle that is exempt from the motor insurance identification fee pursuant to section 42-3-304 (1)(b).

Repealed.

The fee required by subsection (14)(a) of this section is required for every registration of a motor vehicle that is designed primarily to be operated or drawn on any highway in the state and is required in addition to the annual registration fee for the vehicle; except that the fee does not apply to a vehicle that is exempt from payment of the registration fees imposed by this article 3. The department shall credit the fee to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account in the highway users tax fund created in section 42-1-211 (2).

Repealed.

Empty Weight

Registration
(Pounds)

Range

Fee

2,000
and
under
$ 6.20
2,001
but not more than
2,100
6.40
2,101
but not more than
2,200
6.60
2,201
but not more than
2,300
6.80
2,301
but not more than
2,400
7.00
2,401
but not more than
2,500
7.20
2,501
but not more than
2,600
7.40
2,601
but not more than
2,700
7.60
2,701
but not more than
2,800
7.80
2,801
but not more than
2,900
8.00
2,901
but not more than
3,000
8.20
3,001
but not more than
3,100
8.40
3,101
but not more than
3,200
8.60
3,201
but not more than
3,300
8.80
3,301
but not more than
3,400
9.00
3,401
but not more than
3,500
9.20
3,501
but not more than
3,600
9.40
3,601
but not more than
3,700
9.60
3,701
but not more than
3,800
9.80
3,801
but not more than
3,900
10.00
3,901
but not more than
4,000
10.20
4,001
but not more than
4,100
10.40
4,101
but not more than
4,200
10.60
4,201
but not more than
4,300
10.80
4,301
but not more than
4,400
11.00
4,401
but not more than
4,500
11.20
4,501
but not more than
4,600
13.10
4,601
but not more than
4,700
13.70
4,701
but not more than
4,800
14.30
4,801
but not more than
4,900
14.90
4,901
but not more than
5,000
15.50

Empty Weight

Registration
(Pounds)

Range

Fee
2,000
and
under
$ 7.60
2,001
but not more than
2,100
7.80
2,101
but not more than
2,200
8.00
2,201
but not more than
2,300
8.20
2,301
but not more than
2,400
8.40
2,401
but not more than
2,500
8.60
2,501
but not more than
2,600
8.80
2,601
but not more than
2,700
9.00
2,701
but not more than
2,800
9.20
2,801
but not more than
2,900
9.40
2,901
but not more than
3,000
9.60
3,001
but not more than
3,100
10.20
3,101
but not more than
3,200
10.40
3,201
but not more than
3,300
10.60
3,301
but not more than
3,400
10.80
3,401
but not more than
3,500
11.00
3,501
but not more than
3,600
16.10
3,601
but not more than
3,700
16.70
3,701
but not more than
3,800
17.30
3,801
but not more than
3,900
17.90
3,901
but not more than
4,000
18.50
4,001
but not more than
4,100
19.10
4,101
but not more than
4,200
19.70
4,201
but not more than
4,300
20.30
4,301
but not more than
4,400
20.90
4,401
but not more than
4,500
21.50
4,501
but not more than
4,600
35.00
4,601
but not more than
4,700
37.00
4,701
but not more than
4,800
39.00
4,801
but not more than
4,900
41.00
4,901
but not more than
5,000
43.00
5,001
but not more than
5,100
45.00
5,101
but not more than
5,200
47.00
5,201
but not more than
5,300
49.00
5,301
but not more than
5,400
51.00
5,401
but not more than
5,500
53.00
5,501
but not more than
5,600
55.00
5,601
but not more than
5,700
57.00
5,701
but not more than
5,800
59.00
5,801
but not more than
5,900
61.00
5,901
but not more than
6,000
63.00
6,001
but not more than
6,100
65.00
6,101
but not more than
6,200
67.00
6,201
but not more than
6,300
69.00
6,301
but not more than
6,400
71.00
6,401
but not more than
6,500
73.00
6,501
but not more than
6,600
75.00
6,601
but not more than
6,700
77.00
6,701
but not more than
6,800
79.00
6,801
but not more than
6,900
81.00
6,901
but not more than
7,000
83.00
7,001
but not more than
7,100
85.00
7,101
but not more than
7,200
87.00
7,201
but not more than
7,300
89.00
7,301
but not more than
7,400
91.00
7,401
but not more than
7,500
93.00
7,501
but not more than
7,600
95.00
7,601
but not more than
7,700
97.00
7,701
but not more than
7,800
99.00
7,801
but not more than
7,900
101.00
7,901
but not more than
8,000
103.00
8,001
but not more than
8,100
105.00
8,101
but not more than
8,200
107.00
8,201
but not more than
8,300
109.00
8,301
but not more than
8,400
111.00
8,401
but not more than
8,500
113.00
8,501
but not more than
8,600
115.00
8,601
but not more than
8,700
117.00
8,701
but not more than
8,800
119.00
8,801
but not more than
8,900
121.00
8,901
but not more than
9,000
123.00
9,001
but not more than
9,100
125.00
9,101
but not more than
9,200
127.00
9,201
but not more than
9,300
129.00
9,301
but not more than
9,400
131.00
9,401
but not more than
9,500
133.00
9,501
but not more than
9,600
135.00
9,601
but not more than
9,700
137.00
9,701
but not more than
9,800
139.00
9,801
but not more than
9,900
141.00
9,901
but not more than
10,000
143.00
10,001
but not more than
10,100
144.50
10,101
but not more than
10,200
146.00
10,201
but not more than
10,300
147.50
10,301
but not more than
10,400
149.00
10,401
but not more than
10,500
150.50
10,501
but not more than
10,600
152.00
10,601
but not more than
10,700
153.50
10,701
but not more than
10,800
155.00
10,801
but not more than
10,900
156.50
10,901
but not more than
11,000
158.00
11,001
but not more than
11,100
159.50
11,101
but not more than
11,200
161.00
11,201
but not more than
11,300
162.50
11,301
but not more than
11,400
164.00
11,401
but not more than
11,500
165.50
11,501
but not more than
11,600
167.00
11,601
but not more than
11,700
168.50
11,701
but not more than
11,800
170.00
11,801
but not more than
11,900
171.50
11,901
but not more than
12,000
173.00
12,001
but not more than
12,100
174.50
12,101
but not more than
12,200
176.00
12,201
but not more than
12,300
177.50
12,301
but not more than
12,400
179.00
12,401
but not more than
12,500
180.50
12,501
but not more than
12,600
182.00
12,601
but not more than
12,700
183.50
12,701
but not more than
12,800
185.00
12,801
but not more than
12,900
186.50
12,901
but not more than
13,000
188.00
13,001
but not more than
13,100
189.50
13,101
but not more than
13,200
191.00
13,201
but not more than
13,300
192.50
13,301
but not more than
13,400
194.00
13,401
but not more than
13,500
195.50
13,501
but not more than
13,600
197.00
13,601
but not more than
13,700
198.50
13,701
but not more than
13,800
200.00
13,801
but not more than
13,900
201.50
13,901
but not more than
14,000
203.00
14,001
but not more than
14,100
204.50
14,101
but not more than
14,200
206.00
14,201
but not more than
14,300
207.50
14,301
but not more than
14,400
209.00
14,401
but not more than
14,500
210.50
14,501
but not more than
14,600
212.00
14,601
but not more than
14,700
213.50
14,701
but not more than
14,800
215.00
14,801
but not more than
14,900
216.50
14,901
but not more than
15,000
218.00
15,001
but not more than
15,100
219.50
15,101
but not more than
15,200
221.00
15,201
but not more than
15,300
222.50
15,301
but not more than
15,400
224.00
15,401
but not more than
15,500
225.50
15,501
but not more than
15,600
227.00
15,601
but not more than
15,700
228.50
15,701
but not more than
15,800
230.00
15,801
but not more than
15,900
231.50
15,901
but not more than
16,000
233.00

Declared Gross Vehicle

Weight (Pounds)

Registration Fee

16,001 but not more than 20,000
$ 330
20,001 but not more than 24,000
410
24,001 but not more than 30,000
490
30,001 but not more than 36,000
630
36,001 but not more than 42,000
770
42,001 but not more than 48,000
940
48,001 but not more than 54,000
1,150
54,001 but not more than 60,000
1,370
60,001 but not more than 66,000
1,570
66,001 but not more than 74,000
1,850
Over 74,000
1,975

Declared Gross Vehicle

Weight (Pounds)

Registration Fee

16,001 but not more than 20,000
$ 440
20,001 but not more than 24,000
550
24,001 but not more than 30,000
660
30,001 but not more than 36,000
770
36,001 but not more than 42,000
930
42,001 but not more than 48,000
1,130
48,001 but not more than 54,000
1,430
54,001 but not more than 60,000
1,700
60,001 but not more than 66,000
1,980
66,001 but not more than 74,000
2,260
Over 74,000
2,350

Declared Gross Vehicle

Weight (Pounds)

Registration Fee

16,001 but not more than 20,000
$ 330
20,001 but not more than 24,000
360
24,001 but not more than 30,000
380
30,001 but not more than 36,000
440
36,001 but not more than 42,000
500
42,001 but not more than 48,000
580
48,001 but not more than 54,000
600
54,001 but not more than 60,000
640
60,001 but not more than 66,000
660
66,001 but not more than 74,000
690
Over 74,000
710

Declared Gross Vehicle

Weight (Pounds)

Registration Fee

10,001 but not more than 30,000
$ 60
30,001 but not more than 60,000
70
Over 60,000
80

Configuration

Registration Permit

Single unit (two axles)
$ 80.00
Single unit (three or more axles)
120.00
Combination unit (any number of axles)
200.00

Source:

L. 2005:

(6), (7), (11)(a), and (11)(b) amended, p. 147, § 22, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1155, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1269, § 32, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2037, § 13, effective July 1; (12)(a) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1492, § 13, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(14) added, (HB 11-1182), ch. 124, p. 387, § 2, effective April 22; (4)(e) added, (HB 11-1004), ch. 136, p. 475, § 3, effective August 10; IP(5) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 246, § 10, effective August 10; (11)(b) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 425, § 25, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(14)(b) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 371, § 18, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(14)(b)(I)(B) and (14)(b)(II)(B) amended, (SB 18-253), ch. 293, p. 1799, § 4, effective May 29.

42-3-307. Enforcement powers of department.

The department may administer and enforce sections 42-3-304 and 42-3-306, including the right to inspect and audit the books, records, and documents of an owner or operator of a vehicle operated upon the public highways who is required to pay any registration fee or tax imposed, and the executive director of the department may promulgate such reasonable rules as the director deems necessary or suitable for such administration and enforcement.

The powers granted in this section shall be separate, apart, and distinct from any powers or duties conferred prior to January 1, 1955, upon the public utilities commission with respect to the issuance of certificates of public convenience and necessity, contract carrier permits, and the regulation and supervision of motor carriers.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1167, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2037, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-135 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-308. Taxpayer statements - payment of tax - estimates - penalties - deposits - delinquency proceedings.

Every owner or operator of a motor vehicle operated on a public highway of this state and required to pay the passenger-mile tax imposed by sections 42-3-304 and 42-3-306 shall, on or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, file with the department, on forms prescribed by the department and the public utilities commission, a statement, subject to the penalties for perjury in the second degree, showing the name and address of the owner of the motor vehicle, total miles traveled, and total number of passengers carried in this state during the preceding month and such other information as required by the department and the commission and shall compute and pay such tax; except that the executive director of the department may authorize the filing of statements and the payment of tax for periods in excess of one month but not to exceed a period of twelve months.

If payment of the tax so computed is not made on or before the due date, there shall be added a penalty of three percent per month until such time as the full amount has been paid; but the executive director of the department may waive all or any portion of the penalty for good cause.

If the owner or operator of a motor vehicle, required to file a statement as provided in subsection (1) of this section, fails, neglects, or refuses to file the statement and to pay the tax due, the department may estimate the amount of tax due for the period for which no statement was filed, add a penalty of ten percent plus one-half of one percent per month after the date when due, not to exceed eighteen percent in the aggregate, and mail the estimate to the last-known address of such owner or operator. The amount so estimated, together with the penalty, shall become fixed, due, and payable ten days after the date of mailing, unless such owner or operator, within the ten days, files and pays a true and correct statement of the tax due for the period.

If an owner or operator of a vehicle knowingly makes and files with the department a false or fraudulent statement with intent to evade payment of any passenger-mile tax due, the department shall, as soon as it discovers the false or fraudulent nature of such statement, make an investigation and determine the correct amount of tax due, add a penalty of one hundred percent, and proceed to collect the total amount by distraint and sale as provided in section 39-21-114, C.R.S. If an owner or operator disputes the amount asserted to be due and payable, that owner or operator shall be entitled to a hearing before the executive director of the department, and the decision of the executive director shall be subject to judicial review.

A person who willfully fails or refuses to make the report required by this section, or who makes a false or fraudulent return, or who willfully fails to pay any tax owed by such person, shall be punished as provided by section 39-21-118, C.R.S.

All passenger-mile taxes and penalties determined to be due from an owner or operator of a motor vehicle and not paid on the date when the same are due and payable shall become and remain a prior and perpetual lien upon all the personal property of such owner or operator until the full amount of the tax determined to be due, together with all penalties, has been paid. Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or diminish the rights of bona fide purchasers, lienors, or pledgees for value and without notice.

Taxes collected pursuant to this section and any penalties or interest charges imposed pursuant to this section shall be credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., as required by section 43-4-203 (1)(c), C.R.S., and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(d), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2005:

(5) added, p. 148, § 23, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1167, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2037, § 15, effective July 1.

42-3-309. Permit to be secured - records kept - penalties.

Every owner or operator of a motor vehicle operated over any public highway of this state who is required to pay the passenger-mile tax imposed by sections 42-3-304 and 42-3-306 shall apply to the department and secure a passenger-mile tax permit and shall keep and maintain true and correct records of the operations of such motor vehicles, including the number of miles operated and the number of passengers carried, in such form as to reflect the actual activity of all such motor vehicles and as may be prescribed by the department and the public utilities commission. Such owner or operator shall preserve all such records for a period of four years. The passenger-mile tax permit shall remain effective until the owner advises the department of a change in ownership or a discontinuance of business or until such owner has failed to file tax reports and pay any applicable passenger-mile tax for four successive tax periods.

For failure to apply for and secure a permit, the executive director of the department may impose a penalty in an amount equal to twenty-five percent of any tax found to be due and payable or twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater.

Failure or refusal of an owner or operator to keep and maintain such records shall, upon certification by the department to the public utilities commission, be cause for suspension or revocation of a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a contract carrier permit.

If an examination of the financial responsibility of an owner or operator of a motor vehicle subject to the payment of the passenger-mile tax indicates that a financial guarantee in the form of cash, a certified check, a bank money order, a bond, or a negotiable certificate of deposit issued by a commercial bank doing business in this state and acceptable to the executive director is necessary to guarantee payment of the tax, the owner or operator may be required to deposit such guarantee with the department in an amount no greater than twice the amount of tax estimated by the executive director to become due and payable each tax period. If the deposit is in cash or a negotiable certificate of deposit, it shall be subject to forfeiture upon failure of the owner or operator to comply with sections 42-3-304 to 42-3-308, this section, article 10.1 of title 40, or the rules of the department or the public utilities commission; if it is a surety bond, it shall be conditioned upon the insured's faithful compliance with all applicable statutes and rules.

Failure or refusal of an owner or operator to provide or to continue in effect the guarantee when required in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall, upon certification by the department to the public utilities commission, be cause for denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a contract carrier permit.

All cash, certified checks, bank money orders, negotiable certificates of deposit, and surety bonds deposited in compliance with this section shall be delivered into the custody of the state treasurer and held by the state treasurer subject to further order of the department. If an owner or operator ceases operations, the deposit or any balance thereof shall be returned to the owner or operator after all taxes, penalties, fees, and charges owed by such owner or operator pursuant to this article have been paid.

The following penalties shall be imposed if a person negligently or knowingly includes an error in records required by subsection (1) of this section and such error is contained in a previously filed statement under section 42-3-308:

Twenty-five percent of the deficiency assessed; and

Interest of one-half of one percent per month on the deficiency assessed, which shall be in addition to the interest due under section 39-21-109, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1168, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2038, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1724, § 87, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-137 as it existed prior to 2005.